Hawaii statutes.
[§414D-322] Application to qualified
foreign corporations. A foreign corporation authorized to transact
business in this State on July 1, 2002 shall be subject to this chapter but is
not required to obtain a new certificate of authority to transact business
under this chapter. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1]

Revision Note

"July 1, 2002" substituted for "the effective
date of this chapter".

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next